Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB47.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of an at-home medical test. For the purposes of this clause, the term "at-home medical test" shall mean a test done at home, including a pregnancy test or a 12345678910111213141516171819202122 test kit or other equipment, used for the diagnosis, treatment or monitoring of a human disease or medical condition.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0047PN0026 - 2 - 123